Wyoming, session 2025, HB0277.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-5-114 is created to read:

9-5-114. State capitol complex hotel and conference
center.

HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477
(a) As used in this section, "parcel" means the
parcel of land located in Laramie county, downtown Safeway,
lot 1, block 1, more particularly described as all of lots
1, 2, 3, 6, 7 and 8 of block 104, all of block 105 of the
original city of Cheyenne, Thomes avenue lying between the
southerly right of way of west 26th street and the
northerly right of way line of west 25th street, and the
alley in block 104 lying adjacent to and contiguous with
said lots 1, 2, 3, 6, 7 and 8 of block 104, of the original
city of Cheyenne.

(b) Subject to the requirements of this section, the
department shall enter into a public-private partnership
agreement with a person for the development, construction,
operation and maintenance of a hotel and conference center
located on the parcel.

(c) The hotel and conference center constructed under
this section shall:

(i) Have not less than two hundred (200) rooms
available for lodging;

HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477
(ii) Provide conference facilities for a
conference capable of accommodating not less than one
thousand (1,000) attendees;

(iii) Provide food and beverage options
appropriate for a hotel and conference center with the
features specified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this
subsection;

(iv) Provide an appropriate number of parking
spaces for a hotel and conference center with the features
specified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.
For purposes of this paragraph, parking may be addressed or
provided offsite.

(d) The department shall solicit bids for a person to
enter into an agreement for the development, construction
and operation of a hotel and conference center as provided
by this section. Bids shall be solicited in accordance with
law. In reviewing bids received under this subsection and
selecting a person for the public-private partnership
agreement, the department shall take into account, at a
minimum:
HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477

(i) The bidder's plans for constructing the
hotel and conference center in accordance with this
section;

(ii) The bidder's current and past business
practices;

(iii) The bidder's past and present performance
in developing, financing, constructing, managing or
operating hotels and conference centers;

(iv) Whether the bidder has previously performed
public works contracts and public-private partnerships;

(v) The total costs for constructing, managing
and operating the hotel and conference center, the
anticipated revenues and profits for the hotel and
conference center and the proposed contributions of the
bidder.

(e) The public-private partnership agreement entered
into under this section shall include, at a minimum:
HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477

(i) The term of the agreement, including whether
any extensions of the agreement may be made and under what
conditions the agreement may be extended;

(ii) The powers, duties, responsibilities,
obligations and functions of the department and the
selected person;

(iii) Compensation and payments to be made to
the state;

(iv) Compensation and payments to be made to the
selected person;

(v) A provision that authorizes the department
to have access to any information related to the selected
person's powers, duties, responsibilities, obligations,
functions and work performed under the agreement;

(vi) A provision that authorizes the department
to direct, revise or overrule design, construction and
operation decisions of the selected person;
HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477

(vii) Any other provision necessary to ensure
the state's interest, including property rights,
limitations on liability on part of the state and rights
and remedies available to the state in the event of default
or noncompliance.

(f) The state treasurer, with the approval of the
board, shall invest any permanent state funds available
under W.S. 9-4-715(n) for the construction and operation of
the hotel and conference center authorized in this section.
Funds invested under this subsection shall not exceed
ninety percent (90%) of the total design and construction
costs.

(g) All revenues, payments and other earnings
received by the state from the operation of the hotel and
conference center shall be deposited in the public school
foundation program account.

(h) Not later than November 1 of each year, the
department and the state treasurer shall report to the
HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477
joint appropriations committee and the select committee on
capital financing and investments on:

(i) The construction of the hotel and conference
center specified in this section, until construction is
complete;

(ii) The operation of the hotel and conference
center, including revenues and profits earned from the
operation;

(iii) The investment of state funds under
subsection (f) of this section, including earnings on the
investment made under subsection (f) of this section.

Section 2. W.S. 9-5-110(a)(intro) is amended to read:

9-5-110. State capitol building rehabilitation and
restoration project; definitions.

(a) As used in W.S. 9-5-109 through 9-5-113 9-5-114:

HB0277

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0477
Section 3. It is the intent of the legislature that a
public-private partnership for the development,
construction and operation of a hotel and conference center
adjacent to the state capitol complex will allow the state
capitol complex to provide needed amenities that will
provide and will be a public benefit to the state of
Wyoming.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0277